Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 3. Chesapeake Bay Watershed Livestock Stream Exclusion.

§ 62.1-44.122.
(For contingent effective date, see § 62.1-44.119:1) Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Department”
means the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

“Perennial stream”
means a body of water depicted as perennial on the most recent U.S. Geological Survey

7-1

/2-minute topographic quadrangle map (scale 1:24,000) or identified by a method, established in guidelines approved by the Department, that does not require field verification.

“Stream exclusion practice”
means protection of a body of water by fencing, including temporary fencing, or another physical means sufficient to exclude livestock from such body of water. A stream exclusion practice may include designated livestock stream crossings that satisfy criteria established in guidelines adopted by the Department.

History.

2020, cc. 1185, 1186.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1185 and 1186, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall, no later than July 1, 2021, establish through the Soil and Water Conservation Technical Advisory Committee and with stakeholder input a portable stream fencing practice for inclusion in the Virginia Agricultural Best Management Practice Cost-Share Program.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1185 and 1186, c. 5 provides: “That the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, as established pursuant to § 10.1-502 of the Code of Virginia, shall establish, no later than December 31, 2020, the methodology for identifying perennial streams, as defined in §

62.1-44.122

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

§ 62.1-44.123.
(For contingent effective date, see § 62.1-44.119:1) Bovine livestock stream exclusion.

Any person who owns property in the Chesapeake Bay watershed on which 20 or more bovines are pastured shall install and maintain stream exclusion practices sufficient to exclude all such bovines from any perennial stream in the watershed.

History.

2020, cc. 1185, 1186.